Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 4. Rights-Of-Way: Designated Common Carriers

38-4-101.
Tunnel companies.

Any foreign or domestic corporation organized or chartered for the purpose, among other things, of carrying, transmitting, or delivering ores, minerals, or other property for hire by means of a tunnel shall have the right-of-way for the construction, operation, and maintenance of any such tunnel of sufficient size and dimensions for such purpose through or over any patented or unpatented mines, mining claims, or other lands without the consent of the owner thereof, if such right-of-way is necessary to reach the place to or from which it is proposed to carry such ores, minerals, or other property.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 282, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2435.

C.L.

§ 6336.

CSA:

C. 61, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-1.

38-4-102.
Pipeline companies.

Any foreign or domestic corporation organized or chartered for the purpose, among other things, of conducting or maintaining a pipeline for the transmission of power, water, air, or gas for hire to any mine or mining claim or for any manufacturing, milling, mining, or public purpose shall have the right-of-way for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such pipeline for such purpose through any lands without the consent of the owner thereof, if such right-of-way is necessary for the purpose for which said pipeline is used.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 283, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2436.

C.L.

§ 6337.

CSA:

C. 61, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-2.

38-4-103.
Electric power companies.

Any foreign or domestic corporation organized or chartered for the purpose, among other things, of conducting and maintaining electric power lines for providing power or light by means of electricity for hire has a right-of-way for the construction, operation, and maintenance of electric power lines through any patented or unpatented mine or mining claim or other land without the consent of the owner of the patented or unpatented mine or mining claim or other land, if the right-of-way is necessary for the purposes proposed.

An electric utility, as defined in section 40-15-601 (6), exercising its rights under subsection (1) of this section may, in accordance with part 6 of article 15 of title 40:

Install or allow the installation of any attached facility, as that term is defined in section 40-15-601 (1); and

Exercise any rights available to the electric utility under part 6 of article 15 of title 40 in connection with the installation.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 283, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 2437.

C.L.

§ 6338.

CSA:

C. 61, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-3.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-107), ch. 424, p. 3713, § 2, effective August 2.

38-4-104.
Tramway companies.

Any foreign or domestic corporation organized or chartered for the purposes, among other things, of conducting and maintaining for hire an aerial tramway for transporting ores, minerals, waste materials, or other property from any mine or mining claim by means of an aerial tramway shall have the right-of-way for the construction, operation, and maintenance for such tramway and for all necessary towers and supports thereof over and across any intervening mining claims, lands, or premises without the consent of the owner thereof, if such right-of-way is necessary for the purposes proposed.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 283, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 2438.

C.L.

§ 6339.

CSA:

C. 61, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-4.

38-4-105.
Common carriers - fees.

Any such corporations organized or chartered for any or all of the purposes mentioned in sections 38-4-101 to 38-4-104 shall be deemed common carriers and shall fix and charge only a reasonable and uniform rate to all persons who desire the use of any such tunnel, pipeline, electric power transmission lines, or aerial tramway.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 283, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 2439.

C.L.

§ 6340.

CSA:

C. 61, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-5.

38-4-106.
Distance governs rate.

In fixing the rate to be charged its patrons, as provided in section 38-4-105, any such transportation tunnel company or aerial tramway company shall take into consideration the distance over which the materials to be transported are carried.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 284, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 2440.

C.L.

§ 6341.

CSA:

C. 61, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-6.

38-4-107.
Compensation.

Any such corporation shall make due and just compensation for such right-of-way to the owners of the property through which it is proposed to construct, operate, and maintain such tunnel, pipeline, electric transmission lines, or aerial tramway. When the parties cannot agree upon such right-of-way and the amount of compensation to be paid the owner of such property, the same shall be determined in the manner provided by law for the exercise of the right of eminent domain.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 284, § 7.

R.S. 08:

§ 2441.

C.L.

§ 6342.

CSA:

C. 61, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-7.

38-4-108.
Owner entitled to minerals.

The owner of any vein, lode, mining claim, or other property over which it is proposed to construct a tunnel, as provided in this article, shall have the right to all ores and minerals taken from such vein or lode at the intersection thereof with such tunnel.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 284, § 8.

R.S. 08:

§ 2442.

C.L.

§ 6343.

CSA:

C. 61, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-8.

38-4-109.
Owner to have access to tunnel.

The owner of such vein or lode so intersected shall have the right, at any reasonable time and from time to time, upon application to the superintendent or other managing officer of such tunnel corporation, to enter such tunnel with his surveyors and inspectors for the purpose of inspecting and making a survey of any such vein or lode. The owner of such vein or lode and his employees shall have the right of ingress and egress into and out of said tunnel at all reasonable times.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 284, § 9.

R.S. 08:

§ 2443.

C.L.

§ 6344.

CSA:

C. 61, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-9.

38-4-110.
No right to vein matter acquired.

Nothing in this article shall be so construed as to give such tunnel corporation the right to follow any vein or lode without the consent of the owner. When any vein or lode is encountered in driving any such tunnel, such tunnel corporation shall only have the right-of-way to cross such vein or lode at such angle as may be suitable for the convenient operation of the tunnel.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 284, § 10.

R.S. 08:

§ 2444.

C.L.

§ 6345.

CSA:

C. 61, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-10.

38-4-111.
Tunnel company to file map.

Any such tunnel corporation desiring to avail itself of the benefit of this article shall file with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which it is proposed to operate a map or survey of the proposed tunnel for which it desires a right-of-way, together with a statement showing the route of the proposed tunnel and the patented or unpatented mining claims or other property through which it is proposed to construct the same, and may file supplementary maps and surveys upon any lawful change of its proposed line of tunnel.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 284, § 11.

R.S. 08:

§ 2445.

C.L.

§ 6346.

CSA:

C. 61, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-11.

38-4-112.
Pipeline company to file map.

Any such pipeline corporation desiring to avail itself of the benefit of this article shall file with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which it is proposed to operate a map or survey of the proposed line for which it desires a right-of-way, together with a statement showing the route of the proposed pipeline and the patented or unpatented mining claims or other property through which it is proposed to construct the same, and may file supplementary maps and surveys upon any lawful change of its proposed line.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 285, § 12.

R.S. 08:

§ 2446.

C.L.

§ 6347.

CSA:

C. 61, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-12.

38-4-113.
Power company to file map.

Any such electric power transmission corporation desiring to avail itself of the benefit of this article shall file with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which it proposes to operate a map or survey of the proposed lines for which it desires a right-of-way, together with a statement showing the route of the proposed lines and the patented or unpatented mining claims or other property through which it is proposed to construct the same, and may file supplementary maps and surveys upon any lawful change of its proposed lines.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 285, § 13.

R.S. 08:

§ 2447.

C.L.

§ 6348.

CSA:

C. 61, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-13.

38-4-114.
Tramway company to file map.

Any such aerial tramway corporation desiring to avail itself of the benefit of this article shall file with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which it is proposed to operate a map or survey of the proposed route for which it desires a right-of-way, together with a statement showing the route of the proposed tramway and the patented or unpatented mining claims or other property over or across which it is proposed to construct the same, and may file supplementary maps and surveys upon any lawful change of its proposed route.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 285, § 14.

R.S. 08:

§ 2448.

C.L.

§ 6349.

CSA:

C. 61, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-14.

38-4-115.
Companies to transport ore - toll.

Any such tunnel or aerial tramway corporation, subject to its reasonable regulations, shall accept from the owners of mining properties all ores, waste materials, and other materials loaded in cars and delivered to it along its line of tunnel or aerial tramways for transportation and afford facilities for the handling of the same at such place upon payment to it at the rates established and fixed by such tunnel or aerial tramway corporation.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 285, § 15.

R.S. 08:

§ 2449.

C.L.

§ 6350.

CSA:

C. 61, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-15.

38-4-116.
Companies to furnish power - fees.

Any such pipeline corporation or electric power transmission corporation, subject to its reasonable regulations, shall furnish to the owners of mining properties power from said pipelines or electric power transmission lines upon payment to it at the rates established and fixed by such corporation.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 286, § 16.

R.S. 08:

§ 2450.

C.L.

§ 6351.

CSA:

C. 61, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 50-4-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-4-16.